Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3368.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 121A.642, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Qualifications. new text end new text begin Starting in the 2025-2026 school year, a paraprofessional meets the federal personnel qualifications required in Code of Federal Regulations, title 34, sections 200.58 and 300.156, if the paraprofessional: new text end new text begin (1) has at least two years of college credits through an accredited institution of higher education, or an associate's degree or higher; new text end new text begin (2) has received a score of 440 or higher on the ParaPro assessment, or a passing score on a different assessment approved by the Department of Education; or new text end new text begin (3) demonstrates the following competencies, regardless of the number of hours of training the paraprofessional has received: new text end new text begin (i) understanding the distinctions between roles and responsibilities of professionals, paraprofessionals, and support personnel; new text end new text begin (ii) understanding the purposes and goals of education and instruction for all students; new text end new text begin (iii) knowledge of relevant laws, rules, regulations, and local district policies and procedures to ensure paraprofessionals work within these parameters; new text end new text begin (iv) awareness of the challenges and expectations of various learning environments; new text end new text begin (v) the ability to establish and maintain rapport with students; new text end new text begin (vi) the ability to follow oral and written direction of licensed teachers, seeking clarification as needed; new text end new text begin (vii) the ability to assist and reinforce elements that support a safe, healthy, and effective teaching and learning environment; new text end new text begin (viii) understanding strategies for assisting with the inclusion of students in various settings; new text end new text begin (ix) the ability to use strategies that promote the student's independence; new text end new text begin (x) understanding applicable laws, rules, and regulations, and procedural safeguards regarding the management of student behaviors; new text end new text begin (xi) awareness of the primary factors that influence student behavior; new text end new text begin (xii) the ability to effectively employ a variety of strategies that reinforce positive behavior; new text end new text begin (xiii) the ability to use ethical practices for confidential communication about students; new text end new text begin (xiv) the ability to follow teacher instructions while conferring and collaborating with teachers about student schedules, instructional goals, and performance; new text end new text begin (xv) demonstrating a commitment to assisting students in reaching the students' highest potential, including the modeling of positive behavior; new text end new text begin (xvi) showing respect for the diversity of students; and new text end new text begin (xvii) showing a willingness to participate in ongoing staff development and self-evaluation and to apply constructive feedback. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end